Arkansas, session 2025, HB1910.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-462. Deduction — Qualified business expenses.
Title 26 U.S.C. § 199A(a)-(h), as in effect on January 1, 2025,
regarding the deduction for qualified business income, is adopted for the
purpose of computing Arkansas income tax liability.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.







*JLL032*
03/31/2025 11:05:17 AM JLL032